Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62M.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prior authorization of certain services prohibited. No utilization review organization, health plan company, or claims administrator may conduct or require prior authorization of: (1) emergency confinement or an emergency service. The enrollee or the enrollee's authorized representative may be required to notify the health plan company, claims administrator, or utilization review organization as soon as reasonably possible after the beginning of the emergency confinement or emergency service; (2) outpatient mental health treatment or outpatient substance use disorder treatment, except for treatment which is a medication. Prior authorizations required for medications used for outpatient mental health treatment or outpatient substance use disorder treatment must be processed according to section 62M.05, subdivision 3b, for initial determinations, and according to section 62M.06, subdivision 2, for appeals; (3) antineoplastic cancer treatment that is consistent with guidelines of the National Comprehensive Cancer Network, except for treatment which is a medication. Prior authorizations required for medications used for antineoplastic cancer treatment must be processed according to section 62M.05, subdivision 3b, for initial determinations, and according to section 62M.06, subdivision 2, for appeals; (4) services that currently have a rating of A or B from the United States Preventive Services Task Force, immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or preventive services and screenings provided to women as described in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 147.130; (5) pediatric hospice services provided by a hospice provider licensed under sections 144A.75 to 144A.755; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (6) treatment delivered through a neonatal abstinence program operated by pediatric pain or palliative care subspecialistsnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (7) any medication approved by the commissioner of health for inclusion in this subdivision, pursuant to subdivision 6, paragraph (a)new text end . Clauses (2) to (6) are effective January 1, 2026, and apply to health benefit plans offered, sold, issued, or renewed on or after that date. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62M.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Prior authorization commission. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Health must establish a prior authorization commission to: new text end new text begin (1) review the 25 medications with the highest prior authorization denial rates in the state; and new text end new text begin (2) recommend medications for inclusion in the prior authorization prohibition in subdivision 2, based on the criteria described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The commission shall consist of nine members, appointed as follows: new text end new text begin (1) two representatives of the Department of Health appointed by the commissioner of health; new text end new text begin (2) two representatives of the Department of Commerce appointed by the commissioner of commerce; new text end new text begin (3) two representatives of the Minnesota Prescription Drug Affordability Board appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (4) one physician appointed by the Minnesota Medical Association; new text end new text begin (5) one representative of health plans offering prescription drug benefits appointed by .......; and new text end new text begin (6) one representative of pharmacy benefit managers appointed by ...... new text end new text begin (c) The commission's recommendations under paragraph (a) must be based on the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the medication's cost; new text end new text begin (2) the medication's utilization in the general population; new text end new text begin (3) the extent to which health plans cover the medication; new text end new text begin (4) the medication's effectiveness; new text end new text begin (5) the extent to which prohibition of prior authorization may increase premiums for covered individuals; new text end new text begin (6) the medical necessity of the medication for populations of individuals with conditions treated by the medication; and new text end new text begin (7) any other factor the commission determines to be significant in its recommendations under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (d) By August 1, 2026, and each August 1 thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and commerce policy and finance describing: new text end new text begin (1) the commission's analysis of the criteria in paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (2) the medications the commission recommends for approval by the commissioner of health under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, government entities are permitted to share or disseminate data as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of human services may share data on public program drug benefits and utilization with the commission; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of commerce may share data on private market drug benefits and utilization with the commission. new text end new text begin Data shared under this paragraph may be collected, stored, or used only to make the recommendations required under this subdivision, and must not be further shared or disseminated except as otherwise provided by law. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62M.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Commissioner of health approval. new text end new text begin Pursuant to subdivision 2, clause (7), by August 1, 2027, and each August 1 thereafter, the commissioner of health must approve one medication for inclusion in the prior authorization prohibition in subdivision 2. The medication selected must have been recommended by the prior authorization commission in the commission's most recently submitted report to the legislature under subdivision 6, paragraph (d). new text end